src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! !!Noun inflection
!! ---------------
!! Nouns in ERZYA inflect for number, case and declension (definite, indefinite and possessive).

!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Kinship !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON N_КАЛ_KIN
+N+Hum+Kin: NMN_КАЛ ;
:%>О1 N-KIN ;

LEXICON N_ЛАК_KIN
+N+Hum+Kin: NMN_ЛАК ;
:%>О1 N-KIN ;

LEXICON N_КИТ_KIN
+N+Hum+Kin: NMN_КИТ ;
:%>О1 N-KIN ;

LEXICON N_ОШ_KIN
+N+Hum+Kin: NMN_ОШ ;
:%>О1 N-KIN ;

LEXICON N_КЛАСС_KIN
+N+Hum+Kin: NMN_КЛАСС ;
:%>О1 N-KIN ;

LEXICON N_ПАНГО_KIN
+N+Hum+Kin: NMN_ПАНГО ;
:%>О1 N-KIN ;

LEXICON N_ТИНГЕ_KIN
+N+Hum+Kin: NMN_ТИНГЕ ;
:%>О1 N-KIN ;

LEXICON N_КУДО_KIN
+N+Hum+Kin: NMN_КУДО ;
:%> N-KIN ;

LEXICON N-KIN
+N+Hum+Kin+Sg+Gen+PxSg2:ть%> N2Dem-SE ;
+N+Hum+Kin+Sg+Gen+PxSg2:ть N2Dem-SE ; ! _ь_ retension
+N+Hum+Kin+Sg+Gen+PxSg2@U.DECL-NX.SG@:ть@U.DECL-NX.SG@ _КИТ-Conjugation ;
+N+Hum+Kin+Sg+Gen+PxSg1:нь _КАЛ-Tenses-Obl ;
+N+Hum+Kin+Sg+Gen+PxSg2:ть _КИТ-Tenses-Obl ;

!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Human !!
!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON N_КАЛ_HUM
+N+Hum: NMN_КАЛ ;

LEXICON N_ЛАК_HUM
+N+Hum: NMN_ЛАК ;

LEXICON N_КИТ_HUM
+N+Hum: NMN_КИТ ;

LEXICON N_ОШ_HUM
+N+Hum: NMN_ОШ ;

LEXICON N_КЛАСС_HUM
+N+Hum: NMN_КЛАСС ;

LEXICON N_ПАНГО_HUM
+N+Hum: NMN_ПАНГО ;

LEXICON N_ТИНГЕ_HUM
+N+Hum: NMN_ТИНГЕ ;

LEXICON N_ТЕШТЕ_HUM
+N+Hum: NMN_ТЕШТЕ ;

LEXICON N_КУДО_HUM
+N+Hum: NMN_КУДО ;

!! Place !!
LEXICON N_КАЛ_PLC
+N+Plc: NMN_КАЛ ;
+N+Plc:%>О1 LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_ЛАК_PLC
+N+Plc: NMN_ЛАК ;
+N+Plc:%>О1 LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_КИТ_PLC
+N+Plc: NMN_КИТ ;
+N+Plc:%>О1 LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_ОШ_PLC
+N+Plc: NMN_ОШ ;
+N+Plc:%>О1 LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_КЛАСС_PLC
+N+Plc: NMN_КЛАСС ;
+N+Plc:%>О1 LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_ПАНГО_PLC
+N+Plc: NMN_ПАНГО ;
+N+Plc:%>О1 LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_ТИНГЕ_PLC
+N+Plc: NMN_ТИНГЕ ;
+N+Plc:%>О1 LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_КИ_PLC
+N+Plc: NMN_КИ ;
+N+Plc:%> LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_КУДО_PLC
+N+Plc: NMN_КУДО ;
+N+Plc:%> LAT-INDEF ;

!! Lative !!
LEXICON N_КАЛ-LAT
 N_КАЛ ;
+N+Plc:%>О1 LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_ЛАК-LAT
 N_ЛАК ;
+N+Plc:%>О1 LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_КИТ-LAT
 N_КИТ ;
+N+Plc:%>О1 LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_ОШ-LAT
 N_ОШ ;
+N+Plc:%>О1 LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_КЛАСС-LAT
 N_КЛАСС ;
+N+Plc:%>О1 LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_ПАНГО-LAT
 N_ПАНГО ;
+N+Plc:%>О1 LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_ТИНГЕ-LAT
 N_ТИНГЕ ;
+N+Plc:%>О1 LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_КИ-LAT
 N_КИ ;
+N+Plc:%> LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_КУДО-LAT
 N_КУДО ;
+N+Plc:%> LAT-INDEF ;

!! Vocative !!
LEXICON N_КАЙ_HUMVOC
+N+Hum+Der/кай+Voc: # ;

LEXICON N_АЙ_HUMVOC
+N+Hum+Der/ай+Voc: # ;

LEXICON N_HUMVOC
+N+Hum+Voc: # ;

LEXICON N_КАЙ_KINVOC
+N+Kin+Der/кай+Voc: # ;

LEXICON N_АЙ_KINVOC
+N+Kin+Der/ай+Voc: # ;

LEXICON N_KINVOC
+N+Kin+Voc: # ;

!! Common Nouns !!

LEXICON N_КАЛ
+N: NMN_КАЛ ;
+N+Der/НЕ+Dimin:%>Н1е NMN_КУДО ;

LEXICON NMN_КАЛ
 N_КАЛ-Derivation ;
 N_КАЛ-Def-Declension ;
 _КАЛ-Indef-Declension ;
 N_КАЛ-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON N_КАЛ_SUB
+Use/Sub: N_КАЛ ;

LEXICON N_КАЛ-PL
+N:%> DefPl-Declension ;
+N: _КАЛ-Indef-Declension-PL ;
+N: N_КАЛ-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

LEXICON N_КАЛ-PL_SUB
+Use/Sub: N_КАЛ-PL ;

LEXICON N_ЛАК
+N: NMN_ЛАК ;
+N+Der/НЕ+Dimin:%>Н1е NMN_КУДО ;

LEXICON NMN_ЛАК
 N_ЛАК-Derivation ;
 N_ЛАК-Def-Declension ;
 _ЛАК-Indef-Declension ;
 N_КАЛ-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON N_КИТ
+N: NMN_КИТ ;
+N+Der/НЕ+Dimin:%>Н1е NMN_КУДО ;

LEXICON NMN_КИТ
 N_КИТ-Derivation ;
+Use/Sub+Orth/PhonInfl:%>TLoss DefPl-Declension ;
 N_КИТ-Def-Declension ;
 _КИТ-Indef-Declension ;
 N_КАЛ-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON N_КИТ-PL
+Use/Sub+Orth/PhonInfl+N:%>TLoss DefPl-Declension ;
+N: _КИТ-Indef-Declension ;
+N: N_КАЛ-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

LEXICON N_КЛАСС
+N: NMN_КЛАСС ;
+N+Der/НЕ+Dimin:%>Н1е NMN_КУДО ;

LEXICON NMN_КЛАСС
 N_КЛАСС-Derivation ;
 N_ОШ-Def-Declension ;
 _ОШ-Indef-Declension ;
 N_КАЛ-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON N_ОШ_SUB
+Use/Sub: N_ОШ ;

LEXICON N_ОШ
+N: NMN_ОШ ;
+N+Der/НЕ+Dimin:%>Н1е NMN_КУДО ;

LEXICON NMN_ОШ
 N_ОШ-Derivation ;
 N_ОШ-Def-Declension ;
 _ОШ-Indef-Declension ;
 N_КАЛ-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON N_ОШ-PL
+N: N_ОШ-Derivation ;
+N:%> DefPl-Declension ;
+N: _ОШ-Indef-Declension-PL ;
+N: N_ОШ-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

LEXICON N_ИЕ
:е N_КУДО ;
+Use/Sub:й N_КАЛ ;

LEXICON N_ТЕШТЕ
+N: NMN_ТЕШТЕ ;
+N+Der/НЕ+Dimin:%>Н1е NMN_КУДО ;

LEXICON NMN_ТЕШТЕ
 NMN_ПАНГО ;

LEXICON N_ТИНГЕ
+N: NMN_ТИНГЕ ;
+N+Der/НЕ+Dimin:%>Ы2не NMN_КУДО ;

LEXICON NMN_ТИНГЕ
 NMN_ПАНГО ;

LEXICON N_ТИНГЕ-PL
+N:%> DefPl-Declension ;
+N:%>О1 DefPl-Declension ;
+N: _ПАНГО-Indef-Declension-PL ;
+N: N_КУДО-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

LEXICON N_ПАНГО_SUB
+Use/Sub: N_ПАНГО ;

! панго:панг
LEXICON N_ПАНГО
+N: NMN_ПАНГО ;
+N+Der/НЕ+Dimin:%>Ы2не NMN_КУДО ;

LEXICON NMN_ПАНГО
 N_ПАНГО-Derivation ;
 N_ПАНГО-Def-Declension ;
 _ПАНГО-Indef-Declension ;
 N_ПАНГО-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON DV-N_
+V+Der/ОмА: N_КУДО ;

! This might be moved to exceptions 2012-11-21
LEXICON N_КИ
+N: NMN_КИ ;
+N+Der/НЕ+Dimin:%>Ы2не NMN_КУДО ;

LEXICON NMN_КИ
 NMN_КУДО ;
:я PRL-INDEF ;
:я SG-PRL-DEF ;
+Sg+Prl:ява PossPX1 ;

LEXICON N_КУДО_SUB
+Use/Sub: N_КУДО ;

LEXICON N_КУДО
+N: NMN_КУДО ;
+N+Der/НЕ+Dimin:%>Ы2не NMN_КУДО ;

LEXICON NMN_КУДО
 N_КУДО-Derivation ;
 N_КУДО-Def-Declension ;
 _КУДО-Indef-Declension ;
 N_КУДО-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON N_КУДО-PL
+N: N_КУДО-Derivation ;
+N:%> DefPl-Declension ;
+N: _КУДО-Indef-Declension ;
+N: N_КУДО-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

!Does this need a diminutive?
LEXICON N_АВИДЕМ
+N+AssocColl: N_КУДО-Poss-Declension-CX ;


! ========== !
!! DERIVATION !!
! ========== !

LEXICON N_ЛАК-Derivation
 N_КАЛ-Derivation ;
+Use/Sub+Orth/PhonInfl+Tra+Indef:%>KLossкс%> N2Dem-SE ;
+Use/Sub+Orth/PhonInfl+Tra+Indef:%>KLossкс%>О1%> N2Dem-SE ;


LEXICON N_КИТ-Derivation
 N_КАЛ-Derivation;
+Use/Sub+Orth/PhonInfl+Pl+Ela+Def+Der/MWN+N:%>TLossтне%>стэ _КУДО-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Use/Sub+Orth/PhonInfl+Pl+Ine+Def+Der/MWN+N:%>TLossтне%>сэ _КУДО-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Use/Sub+Orth/PhonInfl+Pl+Prl+Def+Der/MWN+N:%>TLossтне%>Г2а _КУДО-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Use/Sub+Orth/PhonInfl+Pl+CompCx+Def+Der/MWN+N:%>TLossтне%>шка _КУДО-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Use/Sub+Orth/PhonInfl+Pl+Abe+Def+Der/MWN+N:%>TLossтне%>втеме _КУДО-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Use/Sub+Orth/PhonInfl+Pl+Tra+Def+Der/MWN+N:%>TLossтне%>кс _ОШ-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Use/Sub+Orth/PhonInfl+Pl+Gen+Def:%>TLossтне%>нь N2Dem-SE ; ! This retains soft sign _ь_
+Use/Sub+Orth/PhonInfl+Pl+Ela+Def:%>TLossтне%>стэ N2Dem-SE ;
+Use/Sub+Orth/PhonInfl+Pl+Ine+Def:%>TLossтне%>сэ%>  N2Dem-SE ;
+Use/Sub+Orth/PhonInfl+Pl+Prl+Def:%>TLossтне%>Г2а%> N2Dem-SE ;
+Use/Sub+Orth/PhonInfl+Pl+CompCx+Def:%>TLossтне%>шка%> N2Dem-SE ;
+Use/Sub+Orth/PhonInfl+Pl+Abe+Def:%>TLossтне%>втеме%> N2Dem-SE ;
+Use/Sub+Orth/PhonInfl+Pl+Tra+Def:%>TLossтне%>кс%> N2Dem-SE ;
+Use/Sub+Orth/PhonInfl+Pl+Tra+Def:%>TLossтне%>ксэ%> N2Dem-SE ;
