src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
авардикурго:авардикург N_ПАНГО_HUM  "XX" ;
авкине:авкине N_КУДО_KIN  "XX" ;
бабай:бабай N_АЙ_KINVOC  "XX" ;
баранозкс:баранозкс N_ОШ-LAT  "XX" ;
беллетрист:беллетрист N_КИТ_HUM  "XX" ;
берёк:берёк N_ЛАК_PLC  "XX" ;
буртаз:буртаз N_ОШ_HUM  "XX" ;
вальмаланго:вальма#ланг N_ПАНГО_PLC  "XX" ;
ванынекай:ванынекай N_АЙ_HUMVOC  "XX" ;
вардыне:вардыне N_КУДО_HUM  "XX" ;
васолбаба:васоло% баба N_КУДО_KIN  "XX" ;
васолбодяй:васолбодяй N_КАЛ_KIN  "XX" ;
ведьберёк:ведьберёк N_ЛАК_PLC  "XX" ;
ведьпандо:ведьбанд N_ПАНГО_SUB  "XX" ;
ведьпарсей:ведьбарсей N_КАЛ_SUB  "XX" ;
ведьпарь:ведьбарь N_КАЛ_SUB  "XX" ;
ведьпря:ведьбря N_КУДО_SUB  "XX" ;
вежавай:вежавай N_АЙ_KINVOC  "XX" ;
вежэйде:вежэйдь N_ТЕШТЕ_HUM  "XX" ;
велеозкс:велеоскс N_ОШ_SUB  "XX" ;
венчакай:венчакай N_АЙ_HUMVOC  "XX" ;
верьгедемат:верьгедема N_КУДО-PL  "XX" ;
вечкабодя:вечкабодя N_КУДО_KIN  "XX" ;
вигинепейть:вигинепей N_КАЛ-PL  "XX" ;
вирь% ютко:вирь% ютк N_ПАНГО_PLC  "XX" ;
героин:героин N_КАЛ_HUM  "XX" ;
гигерь:гигирь N_КАЛ_SUB  "XX" ;
гира:гира N_КУДО  "XX" ;
гуйпанго:гуйпанг N_ПАНГО  "XX" ;
десятник:десятник N_ЛАК_HUM  "XX" ;
дипломат:дипломат N_КИТ  "XX" ;
диск:диск N_ЛАК  "XX" ;
дугакай:дугакай N_КАЙ_HUMVOC  "XX" ;
загс:загс N_ОШ_PLC  "XX" ;
запон:запон N_КАЛ  "XX" ;
зорятеште:зорятешть N_ТЕШТЕ  "XX" ;
идемэйде:идемэйдь N_ТЕШТЕ_HUM  "XX" ;
идеолог:идеолог N_КАЛ_HUM  "XX" ;
ие:и N_ИЕ  "XX" ;
инебаба:инебаба N_КУДО_KIN  "XX" ;
иневедь:ине#ведь N_КАЛ_PLC  "XX" ;
инепромкс:инепромкс N_ОШ  "XX" ;
институт:институт N_КИТ_PLC  "XX" ;
казачка:казачка N_КУДО_HUM  "XX" ;
кальдеркат:кальдерка N_КУДО-PL  "XX" ;
капставидьме:капставидьм N_ТИНГЕ  "XX" ;
каторга:каторга N_КУДО-LAT  "XX" ;
кедьпе:кедьбе N_КУДО_SUB  "XX" ;
кельпарго:кельпарг N_ПАНГО  "XX" ;
керемедьозкс:керемедьозкс N_ОШ-LAT  "XX" ;
ки:ки N_КИ  "XX" ;
ки:ки N_КИ_PLC  "XX" ;
кино:кино N_КУДО_PLC  "XX" ;
кирашко:ки#рашк N_ПАНГО_PLC  "XX" ;
киргиз:киргиз N_ОШ_HUM  "XX" ;
кирдема:кирдема DV-N_  "XX" ;
кирьгаписте:кирьгаписть N_ТЕШТЕ  "XX" ;
кирьгарисьме:кирьгарисьме N_КУДО  "XX" ;
класс:класс N_ОШ_PLC  "XX" ;
коммунист:коммунист N_КИТ_HUM  "XX" ;
коник:коник N_ЛАК  "XX" ;
крепость:крепость N_КИТ_PLC  "XX" ;
крестник:кресник N_ЛАК_KIN  "XX" ;
крестник:крестник N_ЛАК_KIN  "XX" ;
кузвирь:куз#вирь N_КАЛ_PLC  "XX" ;
курокст:курокс N_ОШ-PL  "XX" ;
кутмавкс:кутмавкс N_ОШ  "XX" ;
кши% печть:кши% печть N_КИТ  "XX" ;
лагунпеке:лагунпек N_ТИНГЕ  "XX" ;
лей:лей N_КАЛ-LAT  "XX" ;
лелякай:лелякай N_КАЙ_KINVOC  "XX" ;
ломатейтерь:ломатейтерь N_КАЛ_HUM  "XX" ;
любовник:любовник N_ЛАК_HUM  "XX" ;
лён:лён N_КАЛ  "XX" ;
мамай:мамай N_АЙ_KINVOC  "XX" ;
мацт:мацт N_КИТ_PLC  "XX" ;
мелькть:мельк N_ТИНГЕ-PL  "XX" ;
милиция:милиция N_КУДО-LAT  "XX" ;
молдаванава:молдаван#ава N_КУДО_HUM  "XX" ;
монастырь:монастырь N_КАЛ_PLC  "XX" ;
нахимовец:нахимовец N_ОШ_HUM  "XX" ;
недляютко:недляютк N_ПАНГО  "XX" ;
ноготт:ногот N_КИТ-PL  "XX" ;
нумолкай:нумолкай N_АЙ_HUMVOC  "XX" ;
одрат:одра N_КУДО-PL  "XX" ;
оинекай:оинекай N_КАЙ_HUMVOC  "XX" ;
оймень% ды% седеень% сэредькст:оймень% ды% седеень% сэредькс N_ОШ-PL  "XX" ;
отпуск:отпуск N_ЛАК-LAT  "XX" ;
оцязор:оцязор N_КАЛ_HUM  "XX" ;
ошкужо:ош#кужо N_КУДО_PLC  "XX" ;
пай:пай N_КАЛ-LAT  "XX" ;
пакся% ютко:пакся% ютк N_ПАНГО_PLC  "XX" ;
паксяозкс:паксяозкс N_ОШ-LAT  "XX" ;
панарт:панар N_КАЛ-PL  "XX" ;
панкс:панкс N_ОШ  "XX" ;
парк:парк N_ЛАК_PLC  "XX" ;
печказ:печкас N_ОШ_SUB  "XX" ;
печть:печть N_КИТ  "XX" ;
пеште:пешть N_ТЕШТЕ  "XX" ;
плотина:плотина N_КУДО  "XX" ;
понксгасник:понксгасник N_ЛАК  "XX" ;
потмо% оршамот:потмо% оршамо N_КИТ-PL  "XX" ;
праздник:праздник N_ЛАК-LAT  "XX" ;
приёмщик:приёмщик N_ЛАК_HUM  "XX" ;
прогресс:прогресс N_КЛАСС  "XX" ;
прявтош:прявтош N_ОШ_PLC  "XX" ;
псалтырь:псалтырь N_КАЛ  "XX" ;
пуло% пелькст:пуло% пелькс N_ОШ-PL  "XX" ;
пулокаське:пулокаськ N_ТИНГЕ  "XX" ;
разведка:разведка N_КУДО-LAT  "XX" ;
рапирист:рапирист N_КИТ_HUM  "XX" ;
редакция:редакция N_КУДО_PLC  "XX" ;
розень% товт:розень% тов N_КАЛ-PL  "XX" ;
рыбаловец:рыбаловец N_ОШ_HUM  "XX" ;
ряцозкс:ряцозкс N_ОШ-LAT  "XX" ;
сад:сад N_КАЛ_PLC  "XX" ;
сваткай:сваткай N_КАЙ_KINVOC  "XX" ;
сельсовет:сельсовет N_КИТ_PLC  "XX" ;
сиртьчувто:сиртьчувт N_ПАНГО  "XX" ;
совет:совет N_КИТ-LAT  "XX" ;
совещания:совещания N_КУДО-LAT  "XX" ;
сокс:сокс N_ОШ  "XX" ;
сокст:сокс N_ОШ-PL  "XX" ;
стольначальник:стольначальник N_ЛАК_HUM  "XX" ;
стратонавт:стратонавт N_КИТ  "XX" ;
сырькай:сырькай N_КАЛ_KIN  "XX" ;
сэдьпе:сэдьбе N_КУДО_SUB  "XX" ;
таталя:таталя N_КУДО_HUM  "XX" ;
тейтерьэйде:тейтерьэйдь N_ТЕШТЕ_HUM  "XX" ;
тетидем:тетиде N_АВИДЕМ  "XX" ;
тетидень:тетидень N_АВИДЕМ  "XX" ;
трусат:труса N_КУДО-PL  "XX" ;
тустт:туст N_КИТ-PL  "XX" ;
тёщабаба:тёщабаба N_КУДО_KIN  "XX" ;
урьвай:урьвай N_АЙ_KINVOC  "XX" ;
урьвинекай:урьвинекай N_КАЙ_KINVOC  "XX" ;
физиолог:физиолог N_КАЛ_HUM  "XX" ;
филателист:филателист N_КИТ_HUM  "XX" ;
фурор:фурор N_КАЛ  "XX" ;
церькова:церькова N_КУДО_PLC  "XX" ;
цибилик:цибилик N_ЛАК  "XX" ;
цёраэйде:цёраэйдь N_ТЕШТЕ_HUM  "XX" ;
чамаумарть:чамаумарь N_КАЛ-PL  "XX" ;
чарыйка:чарыйка N_КУДО  "XX" ;
чаулкай:чаулкай N_АЙ_HUMVOC  "XX" ;
чиньчарамо:чиньжарамо N_КУДО_SUB  "XX" ;
чувтопоте:чувтопоть N_ТЕШТЕ  "XX" ;
шахматт:шахмат N_КИТ-PL  "XX" ;
экскаваторщик:экскаваторщик N_ЛАК_HUM  "XX" ;
эрьке:эрьк N_ТИНГЕ_PLC  "XX" ;
эске:эск N_ТИНГЕ  "XX" ;
юртозкс:юртоскс N_ОШ_SUB  "XX" ;
ялгакай:ялгакай N_КАЙ_KINVOC  "XX" ;
ёнкс:ёнкс N_ОШ_PLC  "XX" ;
